test/src/morphology/verbTVot_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked

# Normal even-syllable -o transitive verbs. GÁDJOT_TV, JÅRGGOT_TV, BÅRSSJOT_IV, VILSSJOT_IV

Tests:
  Verb - goarrot: # GÁDJOT_TV
    goarrot+V+TV+Inf: goarrot 
    goarrot+V+TV+Sup: goarotjit
    goarrot+V+TV+Ger: goarodijn
    goarrot+V+TV+PrfPrc: gårrum
    goarrot+V+TV+PrsPrc: goarro
    goarrot+V+TV+Actio+Ess: goarromin
    goarrot+V+TV+Actio+Ela: goarromis
    goarrot+V+TV+VAbess: goarok
    goarrot+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: goarov
    goarrot+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: goaro
    goarrot+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: gårru
    goarrot+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1: gårrun 
    goarrot+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du2: goarrobihtte
    goarrot+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du3: goarroba
    goarrot+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: gårru
    goarrot+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: gårruv
    goarrot+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: gårru
    goarrot+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: goaroj
    goarrot+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: goarojma 
    goarrot+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: goarojda
    goarrot+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: gårrun
    goarrot+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: goaro
    goarrot+V+TV+Imprt+Pl1: goarrop
    goarrot+V+TV+Imprt+Pl2: gårrut
    goarrot+V+TV+Imprt+Pl3: gårrusa
    goarrot+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl2: gårrut
    goarrot+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl3: gårrusa
    goarrot+V+TV+Pot+Pl1: goarotjip
    goarrot+V+TV+Pot+Pl2: goarotjihpit
    goarrot+V+TV+Pot+Pl3: goarotji
    goarrot+V+TV+Der/Pass+V+Inf: goaroduvvat

  Verb - májnnot: # JÅRGGOT_TV
    májnnot+V+TV+Inf: májnnot 
    májnnot+V+TV+Sup: májnotjit
    májnnot+V+TV+Ger: májnodijn
    májnnot+V+TV+PrfPrc: májnnum
    májnnot+V+TV+PrfPrc: májnno
    májnnot+V+TV+Actio+Ess: májnnomin
    májnnot+V+TV+Actio+Ela: májnnomis
    májnnot+V+TV+VAbess: májnok
    májnnot+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: májnov
    májnnot+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: májno
    májnnot+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: májnnobihtit
    májnnot+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: májnnu
    májnnot+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: májnnuv
    májnnot+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: májnnu
    májnnot+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: májnoj
    májnnot+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: májnojma 
    májnnot+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: májnojda
    májnnot+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: májnojga
    májnnot+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: májno
    májnnot+V+TV+Imprt+Sg3: májnnus
    májnnot+V+TV+Imprt+Du1: májnnon 
    májnnot+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: májnno
    májnnot+V+TV+Imprt+Du3: májnnuska
    májnnot+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl1: májnnup
    májnnot+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl2: májnnut
    májnnot+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl3: májnnusa
    májnnot+V+TV+Pot+Sg1: májnotjav
    májnnot+V+TV+Pot+Sg2: májnotja
    májnnot+V+TV+Pot+Sg3: májnosj
    májnnot+V+TV+Pot+Pl3: májnotji
    májnnot+V+TV+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: májnoduváj
